District of Columbia statutes.
47-2888.08

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this part.

March 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 302(b), 61 DCR 1184
Section 401(b) of D.C. Law 20-96 provided that rules promulgated pursuant to the Veterinary Practice Act of 1982 shall remain in effect until the Mayor promulgates rules to implement D.C. Law 20-96.